Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-374
Property insurance; insurable interest required.

No policy of insurance shall be issued upon any property except in the name of some party having an interest in the property.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 34, p. 413;

R.S.1913, § 3170;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. IV, § 5, p. 591;

C.S.1922, § 7770;

C.S.1929, § 44-305;

R.S.1943, § 44-374.

Policy of insurance, issued in name of two joint owners of automobile, could not be canceled by one owner without consent of the other owner. Kent v. Dairyland Mut. Ins. Co., 177 Neb. 709, 131 N.W.2d 146 (1964).